Massachusetts, session 194th, H2445.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by striking subsection (4) of section 51G and inserting in place thereof the following
section:-
(4) Any hospital shall inform the department 90 days prior to the proposed closing of the
hospital or the proposed discontinuance of any essential health service provided therein. The
department shall by regulation define ''essential health service'' for the purposes of this section.
The department shall, in the event that a hospital proposes to discontinue an essential health
service or services, conduct a public hearing on the closure of said essential services or of the
hospital. The department shall determine whether any such discontinued services are necessary
of 2

for preserving access and health status in the hospital's service area and if the department so
determines, the essential health service shall not be proposed for closure for three years.
of 2